Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.465

Violations or unsafe or unsound practices—Injunction to enforce temporary order.

In the case of a violation or threatened violation of a temporary cease and desist order issued under RCW 30A.04.455, the director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the bank for an injunction to enforce the order, and the court shall issue an injunction if it determines that there has been a violation or threatened violation.

[ 2014 c 37 s 139; 1994 c 92 s 33; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 4. Formerly RCW 30.04.465.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: See note following RCW 30A.04.450.